Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2457.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 21-28.12-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 21-28.12 entitled "The
Rhode Island Kratom Act [Effective April 1, 2026.]" is hereby amended to read as follows:
21-28.12-4. Age limits and sales restrictions. [Effective April 1, 2026.]
(a) No person or entity shall distribute, sell, transfer, or advertise a kratom product to a
person under twenty-one (21) years.
(b) All kratom products shall be kept behind the sales counter and within a locked case,
which case would only accessible to store employees until the kratom product is sold.
(c) The sale or distribution of kratom or kratom products to individuals under the age of
twenty-one (21) is prohibited.
(d) Valid photo identification for proof of age is required for all kratom and kratom product
purchases. Acceptable forms of government-issued identification shall include a recent photo of
the individual to whom the identification has been issued showing the date of birth of the individual
to verify the individual is age twenty-one (21) years or over. Acceptable forms of government-
issued identification are: a valid motor vehicle operator’s license issued by the state of Rhode Island
or another state; a valid driver privilege card issued by the state of Rhode Island or another state; a
valid Rhode Island identification card issued by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles;
a valid armed services identification card; or a valid passport.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2027.
========
LC004760/SUB A
========
LC004760/SUB A - Page 2 of 3